hi_js/engnoun.lexc
!!!engnoun.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +N[gcat] +V[gcat] +Sg[lfea] +Pl[lfea] +PREP[gcat] +ADV[gcat] +A[gcat] +Aux[lfea] +RPRO[gcat]
+Relative[lfea] +NEG[gcat] [Guess] +CON[gcat] +fwConsonant[lfea] +fwVowel[lfea] +Indef[lfea] +DET[gcat]

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

[Guess] Constant;
restaurant Ninf;
location Ninf;

LEXICON Constant
[stem]+CON[gcat]:0	#;

LEXICON Ninf

[stem]+N[gcat]+Sg[lfea]:0   #;
[stem]+N[gcat]+Pl[lfea]:^s  #;
